sl-SI: Oblika vložka: Kompaktna; Za dve osebi; Kuverta; S kapuco; Otroška/mladinska; Mumija; Pravokotna; Polpravokotna; Zožena; Potovalna; Drugo
bg-BG: Форма на подплатата: Компактен; Двоен; Плик; С качулка; Детски/младежки; Тип мумия; Правоъгълен; Полуправоъгълен; Заострен; За пътуване; Други
sk-SK: Tvar vložky: Kompaktný; Dvojitý; Dekový; S kapucňou; Detský/mládežnícky; Múmiový; Obdĺžnikový; Poloobdĺžnikový; Zúžený; Cestovateľský; Iné
zh-TW: 內襯形狀: 緊湊型; 雙人; 信封型; 連帽型; 兒童/青少年; 木乃伊型; 長方型; 半長方型; 錐型; 旅行型; 其他
nb: Fôrets form: Kompakt; Dobbel; Konvolutt; Med hette; Barn / ungdom; Mumie; Rektangulær; Halvrektangulær; Avsmalnende; Reiselaken; Annet
en: Liner shape: Compact; Double; Envelope; Hooded; Kid/Youth; Mummy; Rectangular; Semi-rectangular; Tapered; Traveler; Other
zh-CN: 衬里形状: 紧凑型; 双人; 信封型; 带帽型; 儿童/青少年; 木乃伊型; 矩形; 半矩形; 锥形; 旅行者型; 其他
sv: Fodrets form: Kompakt; Dubbel; Kuvert; Med huva; Barn/ungdom; Mumie; Rektangulär; Halvrektangulär; Avsmalnande; Traveler; Övrigt
ko: 라이너 Shape: 콤팩트; 더블; 봉투형; 후드형; 아동/청소년; 머미형; 직사각형; 반직사각형; 테이퍼드형; 여행자용; 기타
ru: Форма лайнера: Компактный; Двойной; Конверт; С капюшоном; Детский/подростковый; Кокон; Прямоугольный; Полупрямоугольный; Зауженный; Для путешествий; Другое
hu: Bélésforma: Kompakt; Kétszemélyes; Boríték; Kapucnis; Gyerek/Ifjúsági; Múmia; Téglalap; Félig téglalap; Kúpos; Utazó; Egyéb
tr: Astar şekli: Kompakt; Çift kişilik; Zarf; Kapüşonlu; Çocuk/Genç; Mumya; Dikdörtgen; Yarı dikdörtgen; Daralan; Gezgin; Diğer
da: Polstringens form: Kompakt; Dobbelt; Kuvert; Med hætte; Barn/ung; Mumie; Rektangulær; Halvrektangulær; Tilspidset; Rejsemodel; Andet
pt-BR: Forro formato: Compacto; Duplo; Envelope; Com capuz; Infantil/Juvenil; Sarcófago; Retangular; Semirretangular; Cônico; Viajante; Outro
ja: ライナーのShapes: コンパクト; ダブル; 封筒型; フード付き; キッズ/ユース; マミー型; 長方形; セミレクタングラー型; テーパード; トラベラー; その他
pt-PT: Forma do forro: Compacto; Duplo; Envelope; Com capuz; Criança/jovem; Múmia; Retangular; Semirretangular; Cónico; Viajante; Outro
th: รูปทรงซับใน: กะทัดรัด; คู่; ทรงซองจดหมาย; มีฮู้ด; เด็ก/วัยรุ่น; ทรงมัมมี่; ทรงสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกึ่งสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงสอบ; ทรงนักเดินทาง; อื่นๆ
nl: Liner vorm: Compact; Tweepersoons; Envelopmodel; Met capuchon; Kind/Jeugd; Mummymodel; Rechthoekig; Semi-rechthoekig; Taps toelopend; Reismodel; Overige
hr-HR: Oblik podstave: Kompaktno; Za dvoje; Omotnica; S kapuljačom; Dječje / za mlade; Mumija; Pravokutno; Polupravokutno; Konusno; Putničko; Ostalo
it: Forma del sacco interno: Compatta; Doppia; Busta; Con cappuccio; Bambino/ragazzo; Mummia; Rettangolare; Semirettangolare; Affusolata; Da viaggio; Altro
lt-LT: Įdėklo forma: Kompaktiškas; Dvivietis; Voko formos; Su gobtuvu; Vaikams / paaugliams; Mumijos formos; Stačiakampis; Pusiau stačiakampis; Siaurėjantis; Kelioninis; Kita
el: Σχήμα επένδυσης: Συμπαγές; Διπλό; Φάκελος; Με κουκούλα; Παιδικό/Εφηβικό; Μούμια; Ορθογώνιο; Ημι-ορθογώνιο; Κωνικό; Ταξιδίου; Άλλο
fi: Vuoren muoto: Kompakti; Tupla; Kirjekuori; Hupullinen; Lapset/nuoret; Muumio; Suorakulmainen; Puolisuorakulmainen; Kavennettu; Matkustaja; Muu
vi: Hình dạng đường kẻ: Nhỏ gọn; Đôi; Hình bao thư; Có mũ; Trẻ em/Thanh thiếu niên; Hình kén; Hình chữ nhật; Hình bán chữ nhật; Hình thon dài; Hình du lịch; Khác
ro-RO: Forma căptușelii interioare: Compact; Dublu; Plic; Cu glugă; Copii/Tineret; Mumie; Dreptunghiular; Semidreptunghiular; Conic; Călător; Altele
cs: Tvar vložky: Kompaktní; Dvojitý; Obálkový; S kapucí; Pro děti a mládež; Mumie; Obdélníkový; Poloobdélníkový; Zúžený; Cestovní; Jiné
de: Form des Inletts: Kompakt; Doppelt; Deckenform; Mit Kapuze; Kinder/Jugendliche; Mumienform; Rechteckig; Halbrechteckig; Verjüngt; Reiseform; Sonstige
pl: Shapesliniowe: Kompaktowy; Podwójny; Koperta; Z kapturem; Dla dzieci / młodzieży; Mumia; Prostokątny; Półprostokątny; Zwężany; Podróżny; Inne
fr: Forme du drap de sac: Compact; Double; Enveloppe; À capuche; Enfant/jeune; Momie; Rectangulaire; Semi-rectangulaire; Fuselé; Voyageur; Autre
es: Forma del forro: Compacto; Doble; Sobre; Con capucha; Niño/joven; Momia; Rectangular; Semirectangular; Ahusado; Viajero; Otro